Illinois, session 104th, SB611.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Displaced Person Relocation Act is amended 5by changing Section 0.01 as follows: 6    (310 ILCS 40/0.01)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 107)7    Sec. 0.01. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Displaced Person Relocation Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1324.)